Utah statutes.
19-9-104.   Creation of authority -- Members.
(1) (a)  The authority comprises 10 members. If the requirements of Section
19-9-103 are met, the governor shall, with the consent of the Senate, appoint
six members of the authority from the public-at-large.
(b)  The remaining four members of the authority are:
(i)  the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality;
(ii)  the director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development or the
director's designee;
(iii)  the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources; and
(iv)  the executive director of the Department of Transportation.
(2)  Public-at-large members, no more than three of whom shall be from the
same political party, shall be appointed to six-year terms of office, subject
to removal by the governor with or without cause.
(3)  The governor shall name one public-at-large member as chairman of the
authority responsible for the call and conduct of authority meetings.
(4)  The authority may elect other officers as  necessary.
(5)  Five members of the authority present at a properly noticed meeting
constitute a quorum for the transaction of official authority business.
(6)  A public-at-large member may not receive compensation or benefits for the
member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance
with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
